Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4010
Application; place of business; fee.

An application for a license shall be required for each place of business of a first owner and shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars. Such license shall be a continuing license unless the license is revoked, canceled, or suspended, and the fees shall be nonrefundable.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 10.